Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1018
Sale of puppy or
kitten; prohibited acts; penalty.

(1) A person,
other than an animal control facility,
animal rescue, or animal shelter, who sells a puppy or kitten
under eight weeks of age without its mother is guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Animal control facility means a facility operated by the
state or any political subdivision of the state for the purpose of impounding
or harboring seized, stray, homeless, abandoned, or unwanted animals;

(b) Animal
rescue means a person or group of persons who hold themselves out as an animal
rescue, accept or solicit for dogs or cats with the intention of finding permanent
adoptive homes or providing lifelong care for such dogs or cats, or who use
foster homes as defined in section 54-626 as the primary means of housing
dogs or cats; and

(c) Animal
shelter means a facility used to house or contain dogs or cats and owned,
operated, or maintained by an incorporated humane society, animal welfare
society, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, or other nonprofit
organization devoted to the welfare, protection, and humane treatment of such
animals.

Laws 2003, LB 17, § 5;

Laws 2006, LB 856, § 12;

Laws 2010, LB910, § 1.